Arkansas, session 2025, HB1255.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-148(c), concerning the coverage of a
continuous glucose monitor within the Arkansas Medicaid Program, is amended
to read as follows:
(c) Coverage for a continuous glucose monitor under the Arkansas
Medicaid Program shall allow the beneficiary to obtain a continuous glucose
monitor through:
(1) A a prescription at a pharmacy and be eligible for rebates
as a pharmacy benefit; or
(2)(A) A written order from a ordering practitioner for durable
medical equipment provided by a durable medical equipment provider and be
eligible as a durable medical equipment benefit.
(B) A durable medical provider shall not be required to
submit a National Drug Code as part of any claim submission under this
section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-77-148, concerning coverage of
*JMB182*
04-03-2025 09:17:58 JMB182

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1255
continuous glucose monitors within the Arkansas Medicaid Program, is amended
to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(d) Regardless of whether the coverage for a continuous glucose
monitor is provided through a pharmacy or a durable medical equipment
provider, the Department of Human Services shall:
(1) Implement consistent approval requirements; and
(2) Reimburse for a continuous glucose monitor provided by a
durable medical equipment provider at no less than the Medicare reimbursement
under the Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System.

/s/Wooldridge

























04-03-2025 09:17:58 JMB182